Washington statutes.
RCW 4.20.010

Wrongful death—Right of action.

(1) When the death of a person is caused by the wrongful act, neglect, or default of another person, his or her personal representative may maintain an action against the person causing the death for the economic and noneconomic damages sustained by the beneficiaries listed in RCW 4.20.020 as a result of the decedent's death, in such amounts as determined by a trier of fact to be just under all the circumstances of the case.

(2) This section applies regardless of whether or not the death was caused under such circumstances as amount, in law, to a felony.

[ 2019 c 159 s 1; 2011 c 336 s 89; 1917 c 123 s 1; RRS s 183. FORMER PARTS OF SECTION: 1917 c 123 s 3 now codified as RCW 4.20.005. Prior: 1909 c 129 s 1; Code 1881 s 8; 1875 p 4 s 4; 1854 p 220 s 496.]

NOTES:

Retroactive application—2019 c 159: "This act is remedial and retroactive and applies to all claims that are not time barred, as well as any claims pending in any court on July 28, 2019." [ 2019 c 159 s 6.]